District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.103

Submission of measure at election.

The District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics shall submit an initiative measure without alteration at the next general, special, or primary election held at least 90 days after the measure is received. The District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics shall hold an election on a referendum measure within 114 days of its receipt of a petition as provided in § 1-204.102. If a previously scheduled general, primary, or special election will occur between 54 and 114 days of its receipt of a petition as provided in § 1-204.102, the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics may present the referendum at that election.

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
1981 Ed., § 1-283.
1973 Ed., § 1-183.